Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.105

Out-of-state applicants.

An applicant holding a credential in another state may be credentialed to practice in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other state's credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the standards in this state.

[ 1991 c 180 s 12.]